Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-15,125
Violation; penalty.

Any person violating the Petroleum Products and Hazardous Substances Storage and Handling Act or the rules, regulations, or orders of the State Fire Marshal or the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment adopted and promulgated or issued pursuant to such act shall be subject to a civil fine of not more than five thousand dollars for each offense and, in the case of a continuing violation, each day of violation shall constitute a separate offense. In assessing the amount of the fine, the court shall consider the size of the operation and the degree and extent of the pollution.

Laws 1986, LB 217, § 9;

Laws 1993, LB 3, § 63;

Laws 2019, LB302, § 124;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 414.